Washington statutes.
RCW 38.12.200

Uniform allowance to officers.

Every commissioned officer of the organized militia of Washington shall, within sixty days from the date of the order whereby he or she shall have been appointed, provide at the officer's own expense the uniform and equipment prescribed by the governor for his or her rank and assignment.

There shall be audited and may be paid, at the option of the adjutant general, to each properly uniformed and equipped officer of the active list of the organized militia of Washington, not in federal service an initial uniform allowance of one hundred dollars and annually thereafter for each twelve months state service an additional uniform allowance of fifty dollars, subject to such regulations as the commander-in-chief may prescribe to be audited and paid upon presentation of proper voucher.

[ 1991 c 43 s 2; 1989 c 19 s 22; 1982 c 93 s 1; 1943 c 130 s 37; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-37. Prior: 1923 c 49 s 1; 1917 c 107 s 32; 1909 c 134 s 49; 1903 c 155 s 11; 1901 c 78 s 8; 1895 c 108 s 76.]